Maine, session 132, LD1391.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §1372, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 376, §1, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
1-A. Abandoned leased space. "Abandoned leased space" means a leased space that:
A. The operator finds unlocked and empty;
B. The operator finds unlocked and containing personal property with a value less than
$750;
C. The possession of and all rights to which and any personal property within which
have been surrendered to the operator by the occupant; or
D. Contains personal property more than 15 days after the termination or nonrenewal
of the rental agreement subsequent to written notice of termination or nonrenewal of
the rental agreement.
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §1372, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 62, is amended to read:
7. Rental agreement. "Rental agreement" means any written agreement, which may
be delivered and accepted electronically, that establishes or modifies the terms, conditions
or rules concerning the use and occupancy of a self-service storage facility.
Sec. 3. 10 MRSA §1373, sub-§3, ¶B, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 62, is amended by
amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Notify the occupant of the condition by e-mail or by regular mail at the
occupant's last known address or other address set forth by the occupant in the
rental agreement;
Sec. 4. 10 MRSA §1373-A is enacted to read:
§1373-A. Constructive acceptance of rental agreement
An operator shall provide an occupant with a rental agreement. If, within 30 days of
the delivery of the rental agreement from the operator to the occupant by hand delivery,
first-class mail or e-mail, the occupant fails to sign the rental agreement, the occupant's
Page 1 - 132LR1688(02)

payment of rent or continued use of the leased space is deemed an acceptance of the rental
agreement, which is enforceable against the occupant as if the rental agreement had been
signed by the occupant.
Sec. 5. 10 MRSA §1374, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 62, is amended to
read:
C. That a sale shall will be held at the self-service storage facility where the personal
property is stored or at the nearest suitable location or online.
Sec. 6. 10 MRSA §1375, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 62, is amended to read:
4. Location of sale. A sale under this section shall may be held at the self-service
storage facility or at the nearest suitable place to where the personal property is stored or
online.
Sec. 7. 10 MRSA §1375, sub-§10, ¶A, as amended by PL 2011, c. 376, §10, is
further amended to read:
A. Notices sent to the operator must be sent to the self-service storage facility where
the occupant's property is stored unless another address to send notices to the operator
is specified in the rental agreement. Notices to the occupant must be sent to the
occupant at the occupant's last known address. Notices are deemed delivered when
deposited with the United States Postal Service, properly addressed as provided in
subsection 2, with postage paid.
Page 2 - 132LR1688(02)